Nebraska, session 109, LB1136.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1136 LB1136
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-905 (1) All tort claims under the Political Subdivisions Tort
Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall
be filed with the clerk, secretary, or other official whose duty it is to
maintain the official records of the political subdivision, or the
governing body of a political subdivision may provide that such claims
may be filed with the duly constituted law department of such
subdivision.
(2)(a) A political subdivision shall maintain on the home page of
its website a notice describing the official or law department authorized
to receive such claims. The notice shall identify the official or law
department by name and title and provide a mailing address.
(b) The filing of a claim with the official or law department
identified on such website shall constitute substantial compliance with
subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The failure of a political subdivision to maintain accurate and
up-to-date information as required by this subsection shall toll the
deadline for making a claim in writing and the deadline for bringing a
suit under sections 13-919 and 13-920.
(3) It shall be the duty of the official with whom the claim is
filed to present the claim to the governing body.
(4) All such claims shall be in writing and shall set forth the time
and place of the occurrence giving rise to the claim and such other facts
pertinent to the claim as are known to the claimant.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-905, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-